District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.01

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 401, ch. 93, title I, § 1
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(q), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1401.
1973 Ed., § 35-1101.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(o) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(o), purported to amend this section that was previously repealed by D.C. Law 14-297, therefore, the amendment was ineffective.

Department of Insurance abolished: The Department of Insurance, including the Superintendent, was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 43, dated June 23, 1953, as amended, established, under the direction and control of a Commissioner, a Department of Insurance headed by a Superintendent. The Order provided for the organization of the Department, abolished the previously existing Department of Insurance, and provided that all functions and positions of the previous Department would be transferred to the new Department of Insurance, including the duties, powers, and authorities of all officers and employees; and that all personnel, property, records and unexpended balances relating to the functions and positions transferred would also be transferred to the new Department. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. The functions of the Superintendent of Insurance were transferred to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs by Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, effective March 31, 1983. Pursuant to the provisions of D.C. Law 11-268, the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation was established and the duties of the Superintendent of Insurance and the Insurance Administration were assumed by the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities and the Insurance Administration in the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs was abolished.